Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 7. Private Activity Bonds.

Sec. 37.15.800.
Tax-exempt bonds and tax credits.

As authorized under 26 U.S.C. 146(e), the state bond committee shall allocate the private activity bond volume limit for the state. Each year at least 25 percent of the limit shall be allocated to municipalities. If the committee determines that a portion of the limit allocated to municipalities will not be used by a municipality during that year, the committee may reallocate that portion.

The committee may make a carry-forward election under 26 U.S.C. 146(f) with respect to all or a portion of the private activity bond volume limit, including allocations that lapse under (c) or (d) of this section.

An amount allocated under (a) of this section lapses on December 30 of the year in which the allocation was made unless

the entity that received the allocation uses it before that date; or

the amount allocated is the subject of a carry-forward election under 26 U.S.C. 146(f).

The committee may adopt regulations relating to the lapsing of amounts under (c) of this section. Regulations adopted under this subsection may establish times when allocated amounts will lapse in addition to the time provided in (c) of this section.

The committee shall allocate tax credit limits and tax-exempt bond limits for the state in accordance with requirements imposed by federal law in connection with the tax credits and tax-exempt bonds. This subsection does not apply to low-income housing tax credits, qualified veterans’ mortgage bonds under applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), or private activity bonds.

In this section,

“private activity bond” means a bond described in 26 U.S.C. 141;

“private activity bond volume limit” means the maximum amount of private activity bonds that may be issued under 26 U.S.C. 146 during a calendar year in the state by all issuers, including the state, municipalities in the state, and public corporations that are agencies of either the state or a municipality in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f); relettered in 2010, at which time subsection (e) was relettered as (f).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on
ch. 18, SLA 1989 (SB 85), see 1989 Senate Journal 33.